Utah statutes.
73-3b-207.   Assignment of permits.
(1)  A person who holds a recharge or recovery permit may not assign a permit
to another person without the written approval of the state engineer.
(2)  The state engineer must approve an assignment if the proposed assignee
meets the requirements of Section 73-3b-202 or 73-3b-205, as applicable.
